Illinois, session 104th, HB4479.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/MMMM new)7    Sec. MMMM. Loan solicitation disclosure. 8    (a) A person shall not knowingly mail or send or cause to 9be mailed or sent a letter or postcard to a recipient in this 10State for the purpose of soliciting or inducing the recipient 11to borrow money, if the letter or postcard:12        (1) contains language that states or implies that any 13    response by a consumer is required, imminently or 14    otherwise, including, but not limited to, the use of the 15    terms "urgent", "action required", "materials inspected", 16    "time sensitive", or "important account information 17    enclosed"; or18        (2) resembles a check or tax document published and 19    mailed by the Internal Revenue Service or the Department 20    of Revenue.21    (b) Any letter or postcard mailed or sent to a recipient in 22this State for the purpose of soliciting or inducing the 23recipient to borrow money shall be sent in a white envelope or   HB4479- 2 -LRB104 17943 SPS 31380 b1postcard and include a disclosure stating "THIS IS A LOAN 2SOLICITATION". The letter or postcard shall also include the 3name and address of the person or entity who would be the 4creditor of the loan. All disclosures and disclaimers 5appearing on a letter or postcard shall be conspicuously 6located at the top of the letter or postcard and on the 7exterior of the letter's envelope, be easily readable in clear 8and unambiguous language, and be printed in at least 14-point 9bold-face font in a black-outlined box.10    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 11practice within the meaning of this Act.